Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 2
Scope and Jurisdiction

§ 28-41-201. Territorial application.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, this act applies to sales and loans made in this state and to modifications, including refinancings, consolidations, and deferrals made in this state, of sales and loans, wherever made. For purposes of this act, a sale, loan or modification of a sale or loan is made in this state if:

A written agreement evidencing the obligation or offer of the consumer is received by the creditor in this state; or

A consumer who is a resident of this state enters into the transaction with a creditor who has solicited or advertised in this state by any means including, but not limited to, mail, brochure, telephone, print, radio, television, internet or any other electronic means.

Notwithstanding subsection (1)(b) of this section, unless made subject to this act by agreement of the parties, a sale, loan or modification of a sale or loan is not made in this state if a resident of this state enters into the transaction while physically present in another state.

The part on limitations on creditors’ remedies, part 1 of the chapter on remedies and penalties, chapter 45, title 28, Idaho Code, applies to actions or other proceedings brought in this state to enforce rights arising from regulated credit sales or regulated loans, or extortionate extensions of credit, wherever made.

If a regulated credit sale or regulated loan or modification thereof, is made in another state to a person who is a resident of this state when the sale, loan or modification is made, the following provisions apply as though the transaction occurred in this state:

A seller, lender or assignee of his rights may not collect charges through actions or other proceedings in excess of those permitted by chapter 42, title 28, Idaho Code, on finance charges and related provisions; and

A seller, lender or assignee of his rights may not enforce rights against the buyer or debtor, with respect to the provisions of agreements which violate the provisions on limitations on agreements and practices, part 3, chapter 43, title 28, Idaho Code.

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, a sale, loan or modification thereof made in another state to a person who was not a resident of this state when the sale, loan or modification was made is valid and enforceable according to its terms to the extent that it is valid and enforceable under the laws of the state applicable to the transaction.

For the purposes of this act, the residence of a buyer or debtor is the address given by him as his residence in any writing signed by him in connection with a credit transaction. Until he notifies the creditor of a new or different address, the given address is presumed to be unchanged.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section:

Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, this act does not apply if the buyer or debtor is not a resident of this state at the time of a credit transaction and the parties then agree that the law of his residence applies; and
(b) This act applies if the buyer or debtor is a resident of this state at the time of a credit transaction and the parties then agree that the law of this state applies.

Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section, the following agreements by a buyer or debtor are invalid with respect to regulated credit sales, regulated loans or modifications thereof to which this act applies:

That the law of another state shall apply;

That the buyer or debtor consents to the jurisdiction of another state; and

That fixes venue.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, any person who, in this state, advertises, offers or solicits to make a loan for a consumer purpose, or arranges a payday loan for a third party lender, is engaging in business in this state for which a license is required under the Idaho credit code, unless exempt pursuant to section 28-46-301, Idaho Code.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-41-201, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264; am. 2002, ch. 301, § 1, p. 858; am. 2006, ch. 122, § 1, p. 340; am. 2013, ch. 54, § 1, p. 108; am. 2014, ch. 97, § 10, p. 265.

§ 28-41-202. Exclusions.

This act does not apply to:

Extensions of credit to government or governmental agencies or instrumentalities;

The sale of insurance by an insurer, except as otherwise provided in the chapter on insurance, chapter 44, title 28, Idaho Code;

Transactions under public utility or common carrier tariffs if a subdivision or agency of this state or of the United States regulates the charges for the service involved, the charges for delayed payment, and any discount allowed for early payment; or

The rates and charges and the disclosure of rates and charges of a licensed pawnbroker established in accordance with a statute or ordinance concerning these matters.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-41-202, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-41-203. Jurisdiction.

The courts of this state may exercise jurisdiction over any creditor with respect to any conduct of the creditor subject to this act or with respect to any claim arising from a transaction subject to this act.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-41-203, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264.

§ 28-41-204. Applicability.

This act shall apply only to credit transactions for a consumer purpose, except for the following parts, chapters and sections, which shall apply to credit transactions for any and all purposes:

Part 1, chapter 41, title 28, Idaho Code;

Section 28-41-202, Idaho Code;

Section 28-41-203, Idaho Code;

Section 28-41-204, Idaho Code;

Part 3, chapter 41, title 28, Idaho Code;

Part 2, chapter 42, title 28, Idaho Code;

Section 28-42-308, Idaho Code;

Part 4, chapter 42, title 28, Idaho Code;

Section 28-45-109, Idaho Code; and

Chapter 49, title 28, Idaho Code.

No provisions of this act other than those specified in subsections (1) through (10) of this section shall limit, expand or otherwise affect the powers, rights, duties or obligations of creditors or debtors in credit transactions for a business purpose.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-41-204, as added by 1983, ch. 119, § 3, p. 264; am. 1994, ch. 185, § 5, p. 603.